Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 12 Rhode Island Turnpike and Bridge Authority

24-12-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings, unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning:

“Additional facility” means any bridge, approach or feeder road, highway, road, freeway, tunnel, overpass, underpass, parking facility or toll facility, in the state, equipment or signal and information system, which the authority is authorized by this chapter or any other law to construct, reconstruct, renovate, acquire, maintain, repair, operate, or manage after May 3, 1954 or any portion thereof.

“Annual period” means the one-year fiscal period of the state commencing on the first day of July of any year and ending the last day of June of the following year.

“Authority” means the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority created by §

24-12-2

, or, if the authority shall be abolished, the board, body, or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or upon whom the powers given by the chapter to the authority shall be given by law.

“Cost” as applied to any project to be constructed, reconstructed, renovated, maintained, acquired, leased, repaired, operated or managed by the authority shall embrace the cost of construction, reconstruction, renovation, maintenance, repair, operation or management, the cost of the acquisition of all land, rights-of-way, property, rights, easements, and interests acquired by the authority for the construction, reconstruction, renovation, maintenance, repair, operation or management, the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which the buildings or structures may be moved, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction, reconstruction, renovation, maintenance, repair, operation or management, and for one year after completion of construction, reconstruction, renovation, maintenance, repair, operation or management, cost of traffic estimates and of engineering and legal services, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of construction, reconstruction, renovation, maintenance, repair, operation or management, administrative expenses, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the construction, reconstruction, renovation, maintenance, repair, operation or management, the financing of the construction, and the placing of the project in operation, and in connection with the Newport Bridge shall include the purchase price of the ferry franchise. The word “cost” as applied to any project which the authority may be authorized to acquire means the amount of the purchase price, lease payments, debt service payments, or the amount of any condemnation award in connection with the acquisition of the project, and shall include the cost of acquiring all the capital stock of the corporation owning the project, if such be the case, and the amount to be paid to discharge all of the obligations of the corporation in order to vest title to the project in the authority, the cost of improvements to the project which may be determined by the authority to be necessary prior to the financing thereof, interest during the period of construction of the improvements and for one year thereafter, the cost of all lands, properties, rights, easements, franchises, and permits acquired, the cost of engineering and legal services, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the acquisition or improvement, administrative expenses, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing of the acquisition or improvement and the placing of the project in operation by the authority.

“Cost” as applied to the Mount Hope Bridge means such amount, if any, as the authority may deem necessary, following the acquisition of a bridge under the provisions of §

24-12-40A

, to place the bridge in safe and efficient condition for its operation. And as applied to any project constructed or acquired by the authority under the provisions of the chapter, the word “cost” shall also include such amounts as the authority may deem necessary for working capital and to create a debt service reserve.

“Cost” as applied to the Sakonnet River Bridge includes such amount, if any, as the authority may deem necessary, following the acquisition of the Sakonnet River Bridge under the provisions of subsection

24-12-40F

, to place the bridge in safe and efficient condition for its operation. As applied to any project constructed or acquired by the authority under the provisions of the chapter, the word “cost” shall also include such amounts as the authority may deem necessary for capitalized interest, working capital and to create a debt service reserve.

“Cost” as applied to the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge includes such amount, if any, as the authority may deem necessary, following the acquisition of the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge under the provisions of subsection

24-12-40G

, to place the bridge in safe and efficient condition for its operation. As applied to any project constructed or acquired by the authority under the provisions of the chapter, the word “cost” shall also include such amounts as the authority may deem necessary for capitalized interest, working capital and to create a debt service reserve.

“Department” means the department of transportation, or, if the department shall be abolished, the board, body, or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or upon whom the powers given by chapter 5 of title 37 to the department shall be given by law.

“Ferry franchise” means the existing franchises and rights to operate ferries belonging to the Jamestown and Newport ferry company, but not including any other intangible personal property or real estate or tangible personal property of the corporation which shall remain the property of the corporation.

“Jamestown Bridge” means the former bridge over the west passage of Narragansett Bay between the towns of Jamestown and North Kingstown constructed by the Jamestown Bridge commission under the provisions of chapter 2536 of the Public Laws, 1937 and the approaches thereto, and shall embrace all tollhouses, administration, and other buildings and structures used in connection therewith, together with all property, rights, easements, and interests acquired by the Jamestown Bridge commission in connection with the construction and operation of the bridge.

“Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge” means the bridge constructed in replacement of the Jamestown Bridge, as defined in subdivision (7) and the approaches thereto, and shall embrace all tollhouses, administration, and other buildings and structures used in connection therewith, together with all property, rights, easements, and interests acquired by the authority in connection with the construction and operation of such bridge.

“Mount Hope Bridge” means the existing bridge between the towns of Bristol and Portsmouth and the approaches thereto, which was constructed by the Mount Hope Bridge corporation and which was acquired and is now owned and operated by the Mount Hope Bridge authority under the provisions of chapter 13 of this title, and shall embrace all tollhouses, administration, and other buildings and structures used in connection therewith, together with all property, rights, easements, and interests acquired by the Mount Hope Bridge corporation or the Mount Hope Bridge authority in connection with the construction and operation of the bridge.

“Newport Bridge” means the bridge or tunnel or combination of bridge and tunnel constructed or to be constructed under the provisions of this chapter over or under the waters of Narragansett Bay between Conanicut Island and Aquidneck Island, shall embrace the substructure and the superstructure thereof and the approaches thereto and the entrance plazas, interchanges, overpasses, underpasses, tollhouses, administration, storage, and other buildings, and highways connecting the bridge or tunnel with the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge (defined in subdivision (8)) and with state highways as the authority may determine to construct from time to time in connection therewith, together with all property, rights, easements, and interests acquired by the authority for the construction and operation of the bridge or tunnel or combination of bridge and tunnel.

“Owner” means and include all individuals, incorporated companies, partnerships, societies, or associations, and also municipalities, political subdivisions, and all public agencies and instrumentalities, having any title or interest in any property, rights, easements, or franchises authorized to be acquired under the provisions of this chapter.

“Project” means the “Newport Bridge,” “Mount Hope Bridge,” “Sakonnet River Bridge,” “Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge”, the “turnpike” or any “additional facility,” as the case may be, or any portion thereof which may be financed, acquired or leased under the provisions of this chapter.

“Turnpike” means the controlled access highway or any portion thereof to be constructed or acquired, from time to time, under the provisions of this chapter from a point at or near the Connecticut-Rhode Island border through the county of Washington and the county of Newport to a point at or near the Massachusetts-Rhode Island border in the town of Tiverton (excluding the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge, the Mount Hope Bridge, the Newport Bridge, and the Sakonnet River Bridge), together with all bridges (except those mentioned above), overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, entrance plazas, approaches, approach roads, tollhouses, service stations, and administration, storage, and other buildings and facilities which the authority may deem necessary for the operation of the turnpike, together with all property, rights, easements, and interests which may be acquired by the authority for the construction or the operation of the turnpike.

“Sakonnet River Bridge” means the replacement Sakonnet River bridge constructed or to be constructed under the provisions of Article 36 of Chapter 376 of the Public Laws of 2003 between the towns of Tiverton and Portsmouth and shall embrace the substructure and the superstructure thereof and the approaches thereto and the toll structures, interchanges, overpasses, underpasses, tollhouses, administration, storage, and other buildings, and highways connecting the bridge with state highways, as the authority may determine to construct or acquire from time to time in connection therewith, together with all property, rights, easements, and interests acquired by the authority for the construction and operation of the bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-1

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1-4; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, §§ 2-4; P.L. 1987, ch. 397, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 71; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 36, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 20, § 3.

24-12-2.
Authority created — Composition.

There is hereby created a body corporate and politic to be known as the “Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority.” The authority shall consist of five (5) members, including the director of transportation, who shall be a member ex officio, and four (4) members appointed by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-2

.

24-12-3.
Appointment of authority members — Oath of office.

During the month of March in each year, the successor of any member whose term is about to expire shall be appointed by the governor for a term of four (4) years commencing the first day of April then next ensuing, but any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the unexpired term. Any member of the authority shall be eligible for reappointment.

Each appointed member of the authority before entering upon his or her duties shall take an oath to administer the duties of his or her office faithfully and impartially, and the oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-3

.

24-12-4.
Officers of authority — Quorum — Reimbursement of expenses of members.

The authority shall elect one of its members as chairperson and another as vice-chairperson and shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer who may or may not be members of the authority. Three (3) members of the authority shall constitute a quorum and the vote of three (3) members shall be necessary for any action taken by the authority. No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority. The members of the authority shall receive no salary for their services as authority members but shall be paid their necessary expenses while engaged in the performance of their duties, and the appointed members of the authority shall be paid the sum of forty dollars ($40.00) for each day or portion thereof in which they are engaged in the performance of their duties.

The secretary and the treasurer shall receive such salaries as shall be fixed by the authority from time to time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-14-4

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 5; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 5.

24-12-5.
Power to construct, reconstruct, renovate, acquire, maintain, repair, operate or manage projects or additional facilities and to issue bonds.

In order to facilitate vehicular traffic, remove many of the present handicaps and hazards on the congested highways in the state, alleviate the barriers caused by large bodies of water, and promote the agricultural and industrial development of the state, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority is hereby authorized and empowered: to construct the Newport Bridge, the turnpike, any portion thereof or any additional facility hereafter authorized to be constructed; to acquire the Mount Hope Bridge, to acquire the Sakonnet River Bridge, to acquire the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge and any additional facility hereafter authorized to be acquired; to maintain, construct, reconstruct, renovate, acquire, repair, operate or manage any project or projects; and to issue bonds of the authority as provided in this chapter to finance any project or projects; provided, however, that the Mount Hope Bridge shall only be acquired as provided for by §

24-12-40A

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-5

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 6; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 6; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 71; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 36, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 20, § 3.

24-12-6.
Grants or leases of state or municipal lands.

All towns, cities, and other political subdivisions and all public agencies and commissions of the state, notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, are hereby authorized and empowered to lease, lend, grant, or convey to the authority at its request, upon such terms and conditions as the proper authorities of the towns, cities, other political subdivisions or public agencies and commissions may deem reasonable and fair and without the necessity for any advertisement, order of court, or other action or formality, other than the regular and formal action of the authorities concerned, any real property which may be necessary or convenient to the effectuation of the authorized purposes of the authority, including public roads and other real property already devoted to public use, and subject to the above provisions, the state hereby consents to the use of all lands owned by it, including lands lying under water, which are deemed by the authority to be necessary for the construction or operation of any project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-6

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 154.

24-12-7.
Revenue bonds not a debt of the state.

Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the state or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the funds provided therefor under the provisions of this chapter. All revenue bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that neither the state nor the authority shall be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon except from the funds provided therefor under the provisions of this chapter, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds; provided, however, that any bonds issued under the provisions of §

24-12-40B

of this chapter shall contain on the face thereof the statement required by §

24-12-40B

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-7

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 7; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 7.

24-12-8.
Expenses limited to funds provided.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be payable solely from funds provided under the provisions of this chapter and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the authority under this chapter beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been provided under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-8

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 154.

24-12-9.
Powers of authority.

The authority is hereby authorized and empowered:

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;

To adopt an official seal and alter it at pleasure;

To maintain an office at such place or places within the state as it may designate;

To sue and be sued in its own name, plead, and be impleaded; provided, however, that any and all actions at law or in equity against the authority shall be brought only in the county in which the principal office of the authority shall be located;

To determine, subject to the approval of the director of transportation, the location and the design standards of the Newport Bridge, the turnpike, and any additional new facility to be constructed;

To issue bonds of the authority for any of its purposes and to refund its bonds, all as provided in this chapter;

To combine for financing purposes the Newport Bridge, the Mount Hope Bridge, the Sakonnet River Bridge, the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge, the turnpike, and any additional facility or facilities, or any two (2) or more of such projects;

To borrow money in anticipation of the issuance of bonds for any of its purposes and to issue notes, certificates, or other evidences of borrowing in form as may be authorized by resolution of the authority, the notes, certificates, or other evidence of borrowing to be payable in the first instance from the proceeds of any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter and to contain on their face a statement to the effect that neither the state, the authority, nor any municipality or other political subdivision of the state shall be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon except from the proceeds of bonds in anticipation of the issuance of which the notes, certificates, or other evidences of borrowing shall have been issued, or from revenues;

To fix and revise, from time to time, subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to charge and collect tolls for transit over the turnpike and the several parts or sections thereof, and for the use of the Newport Bridge, the Mount Hope Bridge, the Sakonnet River Bridge, the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge, and any additional facility acquired, financed, or leased under the provisions of this chapter;

To acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties;

To acquire in the name of the authority, by purchase or otherwise, on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, or by the exercise of the rights of condemnation in the manner as provided by this chapter, public or private lands, including public parks, playgrounds, or reservations, or parts thereof or rights therein, rights-of-way, property, rights, easements, and interests as it may deem necessary for carrying out the provisions of this chapter; provided, however, that all public property damaged in carrying out the powers granted by this chapter shall be restored or repaired and placed in its original condition as nearly as practicable;

To designate the locations, with the approval of the director of transportation, and establish, limit, and control the points of ingress to and egress from the turnpike and any additional facility as may be necessary or desirable in the judgment of the authority to ensure the proper operation and maintenance thereof, and to prohibit entrance to and exit from any point or points not so designated;

To employ, in its discretion, consulting engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment, and to fix their compensation;

To apply for, receive, and accept from any federal agency aid and/or grants for or in aid of the repair, maintenance, and/or construction of the turnpike, the Newport Bridge, the Sakonnet River Bridge, the Mount Hope Bridge, the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge, or any additional facility, and to receive and accept from the state, from any municipality, or other political subdivision thereof and from any other source aid or contributions of either money, property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used and applied only for the purposes for which the grants and contributions may be made;

To construct grade separations at intersections of the turnpike, the approaches, and highway connections of the Newport Bridge, the Sakonnet River Bridge, the Mount Hope Bridge, the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge, and any additional facility with public highways, streets, or other public ways or places, and to change and adjust the lines and grades thereof so as to accommodate the same to the design of the grade separation; the cost of the grade separations and any damage incurred in changing and adjusting the lines and grades of the highways, streets, ways, and places shall be ascertained and paid by the authority as a part of the cost of the project;

To vacate or change the location of any portion of any public highway, street, or other public way or place, sewer, pipe, main, conduit, cable, wire, tower, pole, and other equipment and appliance of the state or of any municipality or other political subdivision of the state and to reconstruct the same at such new location as the authority shall deem most favorable for the project and of substantially the same type and in as good condition as the original highway, street, way, place, sewer, pipe, main, conduit, cable, wire, tower, pole, equipment, or appliance, and the cost of the reconstruction and any damage incurred in vacating or changing the location thereof shall be ascertained and paid by the authority as a part of the cost of the project; any public highway, street, or other public way or place vacated or relocated by the authority shall be vacated or relocated in the manner provided by law for the vacation or relocation of public roads, and any damages awarded on account thereof shall be paid by the authority as a part of the cost of the project;

The authority shall also have the power to make reasonable regulations, subject to the approval of the public utility administrator, for the installation, construction, maintenance, repair, renewal, relocation and removal of tracks, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles, and other equipment and appliances (herein called “public utility facilities”) of any public utility as defined in §

39-1-2

, in, on, along, over, or under any project. Whenever the authority shall determine that it is necessary that any public facilities that now are, or hereafter may be, located in, on, along, over, or under any project should be relocated in the project, or should be removed from the project, the public utility owning or operating the facilities shall relocate or remove the facilities in accordance with the order of the authority; provided, however, that the cost and expenses of the relocation or removal, including the cost of installing the facilities in a new location, or new locations, and the cost of any lands, or any rights or interests in lands, and any other rights acquired to accomplish the relocation or removal, less the cost of any lands or any rights or interests in lands or any other rights of the public utility paid to the public utility in connection with the relocation or removal of the property, shall be ascertained and paid by the authority as a part of the cost of the project. In case of any relocation or removal of facilities, the public utility owning or operating the facilities, its successors or assigns, may maintain and operate the facilities, with the necessary appurtenances, in the new location or new locations, for as long a period, and upon the same terms and conditions, as it had the right to maintain and operate the facilities in their former location or locations;

To make reasonable regulations and to grant easements for the installation, construction, maintenance, repair, renewal, relocation, and removal of pipelines, other equipment, and appliances of any corporation or person owning or operating pipelines in, on, along, over, or under the turnpike, whenever the authority shall determine that it is necessary that any facilities which now are, or hereafter may be located in, on, along, over or under the turnpike should be relocated in the turnpike, or should be removed from the turnpike, the corporation or person owning or operating the facilities shall relocate or remove the facilities in accordance with the order of the authority; provided, however, that the cost and expense of the relocation or removal, including the cost of installing the facilities in a new location, or new locations, and the cost of any lands, or any rights or interests in lands, and any other rights acquired to accomplish the relocation or removal, less the cost of any lands or any rights or interests in lands or any other rights of any corporation or person paid to any corporation or person in connection with the relocation or removal of the property, shall be ascertained and paid by the authority as a part of the cost of the project. In case of any relocation or removal of facilities, the corporation or person owning or operating the facilities, its successors or assigns, may maintain and operate the facilities, with the necessary appurtenances, in the new location or new locations, for as long a period, and upon the same terms and conditions, as it had the right to maintain and operate the facilities in their former location or locations;

To enter upon any lands, waters, and premises for the purpose of making such surveys, soundings, borings, and examinations as the authority may deem necessary or convenient for its purposes, and the entry shall not be deemed a trespass, nor shall an entry for such purposes be deemed an entry under any condemnation proceedings; provided, however, the authority shall pay any actual damage resulting to the lands, water, and premises as a result of the entry and activities as a part of the cost of the project;

To enter into contracts or agreements with any board, commission, public instrumentality of another state or the federal government or with any political subdivision of another state relating to the connection or connections to be established between the turnpike or any additional facility with any public highway or turnpike now in existence or hereafter to be constructed in another state, and with respect to the construction, maintenance, and operation of interstate turnpikes or expressways;

To enter into contracts with the department of transportation with respect to the construction, reconstruction, renovation, acquisition, maintenance, repair, operation, or management of any project and with the Rhode Island state police with respect to the policing of any project;

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter; and

To do all other acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted in this chapter.

To grant and/or contract, through the transfer of funds of the authority to the department of transportation, for the construction, reconstruction, acquisition, maintenance, repair, operation, or management by the department of transportation of any project or projects authorized by this chapter, and the department of transportation is authorized to accept any such grant or transfer of funds.

Provided, the authority, in carrying out the provisions of this section, shall hold public hearings prior to the finalization of any specifications or the awarding of any contracts for any project. Provided, further, that any revenue generated by facilities under the control of the authority shall only be used for the purposes of the authority.

The authority is authorized to enter into contracts with the state, or any department of the state, to operate and/or manage toll facilities on state roads or bridges not owned, leased by, or under the control of the authority, and to collect tolls from such facilities on behalf of the department of transportation, provided such tolls shall be set by the state acting through the department of transportation pursuant to chapter 13.1 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-9

; P.L 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 8-10; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, §§ 8-10; P.L. 1986, ch. 139 § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 36, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 154; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 20, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 4, § 1.

24-12-10.
Eminent domain power.

The authority shall have the right to acquire any land, or any interest therein, by the exercise of the power of eminent domain, whenever it shall be determined by the authority that the acquisition of the land, or interest, is necessary for the construction or the operation of any project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-10

.

24-12-11.
Filing of eminent domain resolution, plat, and statement of amount offered.

The necessity for acquisition shall be conclusively presumed upon the adoption by the authority of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the land, or interest therein, described in the resolution is necessary for the construction or operation. Within six (6) months thereafter the authority shall cause to be filed in the land evidence records of the city or town in which the land is located a copy of the resolution of the authority, together with a plat of the land, or interest therein described, and a statement, signed by the chairperson of the authority, that the lands, or interests therein, are taken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Thereupon the authority shall file in the superior court in and for the county in which the land, or interest therein, lies, a statement of the sum of money estimated by the authority to be just compensation for the land taken.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-11

.

24-12-12.
Taking of possession of lands.

Upon the filing of the copy of the resolution, plat, and statement in the land evidence records of the city or town, the filing in the superior court, of the statement, and the depositing in the superior court, to the use of the persons entitled thereto, of such sum as the court shall determine to be amply sufficient to satisfy the claims of all persons interested in the land (and the court may, in its discretion, take evidence on the question to determine the sum to be deposited), title to the land, or interest therein, shall vest in the authority in fee simple absolute and the authority thereupon may take possession of the land, or interest therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-12

.

24-12-13.
Deposits in court on eminent domain — Notice to owners — Agreement as to price.

No sum paid into the court as provided in §

24-12-12

shall be charged with clerk’s fees of any nature. After the filing of the copy, plat, and statement, notice of the taking of the land, or interest therein, shall be served upon the owners of and persons having an estate in and interested in the land by a member of the division of sheriffs, leaving a true and attested copy of the description and statement with each of the persons personally, or at their last and usual place of abode in this state with some person living there, and in case any of the persons are absent from this state and have no last and usual place of abode therein occupied by any person, the copy shall be left with the persons, if any, in charge of or having possession of the land, or interest therein, taken of the absent persons if the same are known to the officer; and after the filing of the resolution, plat and statement, the secretary of the authority shall cause a copy of the resolution and statement to be published in some newspaper published in the county where the land, or interest therein, may be located, at least once a week for three (3) successive weeks. If any person shall agree with the authority for the price of the land, or interest therein, so taken, the court upon the application of the parties in interest, may order that the sum agreed upon be paid immediately from the money deposited, as the just compensation to be awarded in the proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-13

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 154; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 53.

24-12-14.
Jury trial on price of land.

Any owner of or persons entitled to any estate in or interested in any part of the land, or interest therein, so taken, who cannot agree with the authority for the price of the land, or interest therein, so taken in which he or she is interested may, within three (3) months after personal notice of the taking, or, if he or she have no personal notice, may within one year from the first publication of the copy of the resolution and statement, apply by petition to the superior court in and for the county in which the land, or interest therein, lies, setting forth the taking of his or her land or interest therein, and praying for an assessment of damages by a jury. Upon filing of the petition the court shall cause twenty (20) days’ notice of the pendency thereof to be given to the authority by serving the chairperson or vice chairperson of the authority with a certified copy thereof, and may proceed after notice to the trial thereof; and the trial shall determine all questions of fact relating to the value of the land, or interest therein, and the amount thereof, and judgment shall be entered upon the verdict of the jury and execution shall be issued therefor against the money so deposited in court and in default thereof against any other property of the authority. In case two (2) or more conflicting petitioners make claim to the same land, or to any interests therein, or to different interests in the same parcel of land, the court upon motion shall consolidate their several petitions for trial at the same time by the same jury, and may frame all necessary issues for the trial thereof; and all proceedings taken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall take precedence over all other civil matters then pending before the court, or if the superior court in and for the county in which the land, or interest therein, lies, is not in session in the county, then the matter may be heard in the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-14

.

24-12-15.
Representation of incompetent landowners.

If any lands, or interests therein, in which any infant or other person not capable in law to act in his or her own behalf is interested, are taken by the authority under the provisions of this chapter, the superior court, upon the filing therein of any petition by or in behalf of an infant or other person, may appoint a guardian ad litem for the infant or other person, and the guardian may appear and be heard in behalf of the infant or other person; and the guardian may also with the advice and consent of the superior court and upon such terms as the superior court may prescribe, release to the authority all claims for damages for the lands of the infant or other person or for any interests therein. Any lawfully appointed, qualified, and acting guardian or other fiduciary of the estate of any infant or other person, with the approval of the court of probate within this state having jurisdiction to authorize the sale of lands and properties within this state of any infant or other person, may, before the filing of any petition, agree with the authority upon the amount of damages suffered by the infant or other person by any taking of his or her lands or of his or her interests in any lands, and may, upon receiving the amount, release to the authority all claims of damages of the infant or other person for the taking.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-15

.

24-12-16.
Repayment of excess deposits.

Whenever from time to time the authority has satisfied the court that the amount deposited with the court is greater than is amply sufficient to satisfy the claims of all persons interested in the land, the court may order that the amount of any excess including any interest or increment on any sums so deposited shall be repaid to the authority. Whenever the authority has satisfied the court that the claims of all persons interested in the land taken have been satisfied, the unexpended balance including any interest or increment on any sums so deposited shall be paid immediately to the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-16

.

24-12-17.
Expediting proceedings — Land devoted to public use — Outstanding interests.

In any proceedings for the assessment of compensation and damages for land or interest therein taken or to be taken by eminent domain by the authority the following provisions shall be applicable:

At any time during the pendency of an action or proceeding, the authority or an owner may apply to the court for an order directing an owner or the authority, as the case may be, to show cause why further proceedings should not be expedited, and the court may upon the application make an order requiring that the hearings proceed and that any other steps be taken with all possible expedition.

If any of the land, or interest therein, is devoted to a public use, it may nevertheless be acquired, and the taking shall be effective provided that no land or interest therein, belonging to a public utility corporation may be acquired without the approval of the administrator of public utilities or other officer or tribunal having regulatory power over the corporation. Any land, or interest therein, already acquired by the authority may nevertheless be included within the taking for the purpose of acquiring any outstanding interests in the land.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-17

.